District of Columbia statutes.
47-2883.06

Authority and power of Mayor deemed supplementary.

The authority and power vested in the Mayor by any provision of this part shall be deemed to be additional and supplementary to authority and power now vested in him, and not as a limitation.

History

Sept. 6, 1960, 74 Stat. 816, Pub. L. 86-715, § 6
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-506.
1973 Ed., § 2-2306.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.